Washington statutes.
RCW 36.08.090

Transcript of records by county auditor.

The county auditor of the county to which any territory may be transferred may take transcripts of all records, books, papers, etc., on file in the office of the county auditor of the county from which the territory has been transferred, which may be necessary to perfect the records of his or her county, and for this purpose he or she shall have access to the records of the county from which such territory is stricken, free of cost.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4003; 1963 c 4 s 36.08.090. Prior: 1891 c 144 s 9; RRS s 3980.]